ko: 수동 타격 마운트 부착 메커니즘: 접착식/스트랩 마운트; 볼트 온/스크류 마운트; 클램프 온(스탠드 튜브용); 심벌즈 스탠드 마운트; 드럼 림 마운트; 하이햇 스탠드 마운트; 마그네틱 마운트; 멀티 클램프/듀얼 클램프; 타악기 포스트 마운트; 랙 마운트(랙 바용); 로드 마운트(L 로드/Z 로드); 기타
th: กลไกยึดแท่นตีมือ: ติดกาว/สายรัด; ขันน็อต / ขันสกรู; แคลมป์หนีบ (กับเสาขาตั้ง); ยึดกับขาตั้งฉาบ; ยึดกับขอบกลอง; ยึดกับขาตั้งไฮแฮท; ยึดด้วยแม่เหล็ก; มัลติแคลมป์ / แคลมป์คู่; ยึดกับเสาเพอร์คัชชัน; ยึดกับแร็ค (กับบาร์แร็ค); ยึดกับก้าน (L-rod/Z-rod); อื่นๆ
it: Meccanismo di fissaggio per percussione manuale: Supporto adesivo/con cinturino; Supporto imbullonato/a vite; A morsetto (su tubo del supporto); Montaggio su asta del piatto; Montaggio su cerchio del tamburo; Montaggio su asta del charleston; Supporto magnetico; Morsetto multiplo/doppio morsetto; Montaggio su asta per percussioni; Montaggio su rack (a barra rack); Montaggio ad asta (L-rod/Z-rod); Altro
es: Mecanismo de fijación del soporte de percusión manual: Montaje adhesivo/con correa; Montaje atornillado; Montaje con abrazadera (al tubo del soporte); Montaje para soporte de platillo; Montaje en el aro del tambor; Montaje para soporte de hi-hat; Montaje magnético; Multisoporte/abrazadera doble; Montaje en poste de percusión; Montaje en bastidor (a la barra del bastidor); Montaje de varilla (varilla en L/varilla en Z); Otro
de: Befestigungsmechanismus der Handperkussionshalterung: Klebepad-/Gurtbefestigung; Schraubbefestigung; Klemme (an Standrohr); Beckenständerhalterung; Trommelrandhalterung; Hi-Hat-Ständerhalterung; Magnethalterung; Multiklammer/Doppelklammer; Percussion-Stangenhalterung; Rack-Halterung (an Rackstange); Dornhalterung (L-Rod/Z-Rod); Sonstige
pt-BR: Percussão de mão suporte mecanismo de fixação: Suporte adesivo/cinta; Montagem por parafuso/rosca; Abraçadeira (para tubo de pedestal); Suporte para pedestal de prato; Suporte para aro de bateria; Suporte para máquina de chimbal; Suporte magnético; Multiclamp / abraçadeira dupla; Suporte para haste de percussão; Suporte para rack (na barra do rack); Suporte de haste (haste em L/haste em Z); Outro
tr: El perküsyonu montaj bağlantı mekanizması: Yapışkanlı/kayışlı montaj; Cıvatalı/vidalı montaj; Kelepçeli (stant borusuna); Zil standı montajı; Davul kasnağı montajı; Hi-hat standı montajı; Manyetik montaj; Çoklu kelepçe/çift kelepçe; Vurmalı çalgı direği montajı; Raf montajı (raf çubuğuna); Çubuk montajı (L çubuk/Z çubuk); Diğer
zh-TW: 手持打擊樂器支架連接機構: 黏貼/綁帶固定座; 螺栓/螺絲固定座; 夾鉗式 (夾於管架); 鈸架固定座; 鼓框固定座; Hi-hat 支架固定座; 磁性固定座; 多功能夾鉗 / 雙夾鉗; 打擊樂柱固定座; 支架固定座 (夾於支架桿); 桿形固定座 (L 型桿/Z 型桿); 其他
fr: Mécanisme de fixation du support pour percussion à main: Support adhésif/sangle; Montage par boulons/vis; Montage par pince (sur tube de pied); Support pour pied de cymbale; Support pour cerclage de fût; Support pour pied de charleston; Support magnétique; Pince multiple/double pince; Support pour tige de percussion; Montage sur rack (sur barre de rack); Montage sur tige (tige en L/tige en Z); Autre
cs: Mechanismus upevnění perkusí na stojan: Přilepení/páskem; Přišroubování; Svorkou (na trubku stojanu); Na činelový stojan; Na ráfek bubnu; Na stojan pro hi-hat; Magnetický úchyt; Multiclamp / dvojitá svorka; Na perkusní tyč; Na rampu (na tyč rampy); Na tyč (L-tyč / Z-tyč); Jiný
hu: Kézi ütőhangszer rögzítési mechanizmusa: Ragasztós/pántos rögzítés; Csavaros rögzítés; Bilincses (állványcsőhöz); Cintányérállványhoz rögzíthető; Dobkávához rögzíthető; Lábcintányér-állványhoz rögzíthető; Mágneses rögzítés; Többszörös / dupla bilincs; Ütőhangszer-állvány rögzítése; Karámhoz rögzíthető; Rúdra rögzíthető (L-rúd / Z-rúd); Egyéb
pl: Mechanizm mocowania uchwytu do ręcznych instrumentów perkusyjnych: Montaż na klej/pasek; Montaż na śruby/wkręty; Montaż na zacisk (do rury statywu); Montaż do statywu pod talerz; Montaż do obręczy bębna; Montaż do statywu hi-hat; Montaż magnetyczny; Multizacisk / podwójny zacisk; Montaż na sztycy perkusyjnej; Montaż do ramy (do rury ramy); Montaż na pręcie (L-rod/Z-rod); Inne
el: Μηχανισμός προσάρτησης βάσης για κρουστά χειρός: Αυτοκόλλητο/βάση με ιμάντα; Βιδωτή βάση; Με σφιγκτήρα (σε σωλήνα βάσης); Βάση για πιατίνια; Βάση για στεφάνι τυμπάνου; Βάση hi-hat; Μαγνητική βάση; Πολλαπλός σφιγκτήρας / διπλός σφιγκτήρας; Βάση σε στύλο κρουστών; Βάση σε ράφι (σε ράβδο ραφιού); Βάση σε ράβδο (L-rod/Z-rod); Άλλο
sk-SK: Mechanizmus upevnenia držiaka na ručné perkusie: Montáž lepením/popruhom; Upevnenie skrutkou; Upevnenie svorkou (na trubicu stojana); Montáž na činelový stojan; Montáž na ráfik bubna; Montáž na hi-hat stojan; Magnetické upevnenie; Viacnásobná svorka / dvojitá svorka; Montáž na perkusiový stĺpik; Montáž na stojan (na rampu); Montáž na tyč (L-tyč/Z-tyč); Iné
bg-BG: Механизъм за закрепване на ръчен перкусионен държач: Залепващ/лентов монтаж; Монтаж с болтове / винтове; Монтаж със скоба (към тръба на стойка); Монтаж за стойка за чинели; Монтаж на обръч на барабан; Монтаж за стойка за фус; Магнитен монтаж; Мулти-скоба / двойна скоба; Монтаж на перкусионна стойка; Монтаж на рак (към рак тръба); Монтаж на прът (L-образен/Z-образен); Друго
fi: Perkussiosoittimen kiinnitysmekanismi: Tarra-/hihnakiinnitys; Pultti- / ruuvikiinnitys; Puristinkiinnitys (telineen putkeen); Symbaalitelineen kiinnitys; Rummun vanteen kiinnitys; Hi-hat-telineen kiinnitys; Magneettikiinnitys; Monitoimipuristin / kaksoispuristin; Lyömäsoitintelineen kiinnitys; Räkkikiinnitys (räkin putkeen); Tankokiinnitys (L-tanko / Z-tanko); Muu
nb: Festemekanisme for håndperkusjonsfeste: Selvklebende / stroppfeste; Skrufeste; Klemme (til stativrør); Feste til cymbalstativ; Feste til trommesarg; Feste til hihat-stativ; Magnetfeste; Multiklemme / dobbel klemme; Feste til perkusjonsstolpe; Rack-feste (til rack-stang); Stangfeste (L-stang/Z-stang); Annet
lt-LT: Rankinių mušamųjų tvirtinimo mechanizmas: Tvirtinimas klijais / dirželiu; Tvirtinamas varžtais; Prispaudžiamas (prie stovo vamzdžio); Lėkščių stovo laikiklis; Būgno lanko laikiklis; „Hi-hat“ stovo laikiklis; Magnetinis laikiklis; Daugiafunkcis spaustukas / dvigubas spaustukas; Perkusijos stovo laikiklis; Tvirtinimas prie stelažo (prie stelažo strypo); Tvirtinimas prie strypo (L tipo / Z tipo); Kita
hr-HR: Mehanizam za pričvršćivanje nosača za ručne udaraljke: Ljepljivi nosač / nosač s remenom; Nosač s vijcima; Nosač sa stezaljkom (na cijev stalka); Nosač za stalak za činele; Nosač za obruč bubnja; Nosač za stalak za hi-hat; Magnetski nosač; Višestruka stezaljka / dvostruka stezaljka; Nosač sa šipkom za udaraljke; Nosač za stalak (na šipku stalka); Nosač sa šipkom (L-šipka / Z-šipka); Ostalo
vi: Cơ chế gắn giá đỡ tay bảo vệ: Gắn keo/dây đai; Gắn bu lông / ốc vít; Gắn kẹp (vào ống chân đế); Gắn chân đế chũm chọe; Gắn vành trống; Gắn chân đế hi-hat; Gắn nam châm; Kẹp đa năng / kẹp đôi; Gắn cọc bộ gõ; Gắn giá đỡ (vào thanh giá đỡ); Gắn thanh (thanh chữ L/chữ Z); Khác
nl: Handpercussiehouder bevestigingsmechanisme: Plak-/bandbevestiging; Bout- / schroefbevestiging; Klembevestiging (aan statiefbuis); Bekkenstatief-bevestiging; Drumrand-bevestiging; Hi-hat-statief-bevestiging; Magnetische bevestiging; Multi-klem / dubbele klem; Percussie-postbevestiging; Rekbevestiging (aan rekstang); Stangbevestiging (L-stang/Z-stang); Overig
ja: ハンドパーカッションマウント取り付けメカニズム: 粘着/ストラップマウント; ボルトオン/ネジ留めマウント; クランプオン (スタンドチューブ用); シンバルスタンドマウント; ドラムリムマウント; ハイハットスタンドマウント; マグネットマウント; マルチクランプ/デュアルクランプ; パーカッションポストマウント; ラックマウント (ラックバー用); ロッドマウント (Lロッド/Zロッド); その他
en: Hand percussion mount attachment mechanism: Adhesive/strap mount; Bolt-on / screw mount; Clamp-on (to stand tube); Cymbal-stand mount; Drum-rim mount; Hi-hat-stand mount; Magnetic mount; Multi-clamp / dual clamp; Percussion post mount; Rack mount (to rack bar); Rod mount (L-rod/Z-rod); Other
sl-SI: Mehanizem za pritrditev nosilca ročnih tolkal: Pritrditev z lepilom/trakom; Pritrditev z vijaki; Objemka (na cev stojala); Nosilec za stojalo činel; Nosilec za obroč bobna; Nosilec za stojalo hi-hat; Magnetni nosilec; Večkratna objemka/dvojna objemka; Nosilec za tolkala; Pritrditev na stojalo (na prečko stojala); Pritrditev s palico (L-palica/Z-palica); Drugo
pt-PT: Mecanismo de fixação do suporte de percussão manual: Suporte adesivo/de fita; Suporte aparafusado; Com braçadeira (para tubo do suporte); Suporte para tripé de pratos; Suporte no aro do tambor; Suporte para tripé de pratos de choque; Suporte magnético; Braçadeira múltipla/dupla; Suporte no poste de percussão; Montagem em estante (para barra de estante); Suporte em haste (haste em L/haste em Z); Outro
ru: Механизм крепления ручной перкуссии: Крепление на клейкой основе/ремне; Крепление на болтах/винтах; Зажим (на трубу стойки); Крепление на стойку для тарелок; Крепление на обод барабана; Крепление на стойку для хай-хэта; Магнитное крепление; Мультикламп/двойной зажим; Крепление на перкуссионную стойку; Крепление на раму (на перекладину); Крепление на стержень (L-образный/Z-образный); Другое
zh-CN: 手持打击乐器安装附件机构: 粘胶/绑带安装; 螺栓/螺丝安装; 夹紧（在支架管上）; 镲架安装; 鼓圈安装; 踩镲架安装; 磁吸安装; 多重夹钳/双重夹钳; 打击乐器柱安装; 鼓架安装（在支架杆上）; 连杆安装（L 型杆/Z 型杆）; 其他
ro-RO: Mecanismul de prindere pentru montarea instrumentului de percuție manuală: Montare cu adeziv/curea; Montare cu șuruburi; Cu clemă (pe tubul stativului); Montare pe stativ pentru cinel; Montare pe marginea tobei; Montare pe stativ pentru fus-cinel; Montură magnetică; Clemă multiplă / clemă dublă; Montare pe tijă pentru percuție; Montare pe cadru (pe bara cadrului); Montare pe tijă (L-rod/Z-rod); Altele
da: Håndpercussion-monteringsmekanisme: Montering med klæb/strop; Montering med bolt/skrue; Montering med klemme (til stativrør); Montering til bækkenstativ; Montering til trommekant; Montering til hi-hat-stativ; Magnetisk montering; Multiklemme/dobbeltklemme; Montering til slagtøjsstang; Rack-montering (til rack-stang); Rod-montering (L-rod/Z-rod); Andet
sv: Fästmekanism för handslagverk: Självhäftande/remfäste; Bultat/skruvat fäste; Klämfäste (på stativrör); Fäste för cymbalstativ; Fäste för trumkant; Fäste för hi-hat-stativ; Magnetiskt fäste; Multiklämma/dubbelklämma; Fäste för slagverksstolpe; Rackfäste (på rackrör); Stångfäste (L-stång/Z-stång); Övrigt